Alabama, session 2026rs, HB106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-11-38, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§13A-11-38
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) FIREFIGHTER. The term as defined in Section
36-21-180.
(2) GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION. The term as defined in
Section 13A-10-1.
(3) LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. An officer employed by the
state, county, or municipality who is certified by the Alabama
Police Officers' Standards and Training Commission and who has
the power of arrest.
(4) PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION. Includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following:
a. Home address.
b. Photographs or information of the victim's children,
including the schools they attend.
c. Any other information that would enable the victim
to be harassed, threatened, or harmed.
(5) PUBLIC SERVANT. The term as defined in Section
13A-10-1.
(b) An individual commits the crime of doxing if he or
she does any either of the following:
(1) Intentionally electronically publishes, posts, or
provides personal identifying information of another
individual, with the intent that others will use that
Page 2

individual, with the intent that others will use that
HB106 INTRODUCED
information to harass or harm that individual.
(2) Intentionally electronically publishes, posts, or
provides personal identifying information of another
individual, with the intent that others will use that
information to harass or harm that other individual, and the
other individual is actually harassed or harmed.
(3)(2) Intentionally electronically publishes, posts,
or provides personal identifying information of a law
enforcement officer, firefighter, or public servant, with the
intent that others will use that information to harass, harm,
or impede the duties of that law enforcement officer,
firefighter, or public servant, and the law enforcement
officer, firefighter, or public servant is actually harassed,
harmed, or impeded from performing his or her governmental
function.
(c)(1) A first violation of subsectionsubdivision
(b)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) A second or subsequent violation of
subsectionsubdivision (b)(1) is a Class C felony.
(3) A first violation of subdivision (b)(2) or (b)(3)
is a Class C felony.
(4) A second or subsequent violation of subdivision
(b)(2) or (b)(3) is a Class B felony.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
any of the following:
(1) Political speech protected by the First Amendment
of the United States Constitution.
(2) The publication of contact information of public
Page 3

(2) The publication of contact information of public
HB106 INTRODUCED
officials by any individual or organization for the purpose of
encouraging citizens to lobby the public official for or
against any policy or legislative act. For purposes of this
subdivision, contact information means an official address,
email, or phone number used by the public official for his or
her public service."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4